Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 5. Probation Counselors

§ 5-3-501.
Definitions.

When used in this act [§§

5-3-501

through

5-3-504

], the following definitions will apply unless the context otherwise requires:

Court. — The word “court” shall mean the district or juvenile courts;

Counselor. — An officer appointed by the county commissioners with the approval of the district judge in the district where he is to be employed under the provisions of this act to work with juvenile offenders, and parolees or probationers;

Probationer. — Any person placed on probation with the imposition and execution of sentence suspended after a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or after conviction of any offense in any district or juvenile court in Wyoming, or by any court of a foreign state having jurisdiction to place such offenders on probation, or any person who has been paroled before sentence by any district or juvenile court;

Tense, Gender. — The singular includes the plural, the plural the singular, and the masculine the feminine, when consistent with the intent of the act.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-84.1; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to probation and parole generally, see §

7-13-401

et seq.

As to juvenile probation, see title 14, chapter 6, article 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 5-3-502.
Employment authorized; employment of 1 counselor for 2 or more districts.

The county commissioners
are hereby authorized to employ sufficient counselors in such judicial
district upon the written request of the district judge or judges
therein. In any district where in the discretion of the district judge
or judges the case load does not justify the hiring of a counselor,
a counselor may be employed to work in two (2) or more districts.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 99, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-84.2.

Cross references. —

As to county commissioners generally, see §

18-3-501

et seq.

§ 5-3-503.
Appointment after approval by district judge; determination of maximum
salary.

Counselors may be appointed
by the county commissioners only after the applicant is interviewed
and approved by the district judge or judges in the district in which
he is to be employed. The maximum salary of counselors appointed under
the provisions of this act [§§

5-3-501

through

5-3-504

], shall be determined by the county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 99, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 5-84.3.

§ 5-3-504.
Duties.

Each counselor employed under the provisions of this act [§§

5-3-501

through

5-3-504

] shall have the following duties:

He shall make a complete social and background investigation of all persons referred to him by the court. This investigation shall include past violations, family background, present source of income and family status. It shall include a written recommendation as to disposition of the offender by the counselor, which shall be submitted to the court prior to sentencing:

The investigation may be waived by the offender unless the court specifically requests it;

Special attention shall be given to minor offenders in the effort to rehabilitate them toward responsible citizenship;

He may make social history investigations where requested by judges in cases where minors are involved. In such cases he may assume authority where the offender is placed on probation by the presiding officer;

He shall furnish to each person released on probation and placed under his supervision a written statement of conditions of the probation or parole and shall instruct each of his charges thereon. Each counselor shall keep informed concerning the conduct and conditions of each person in his charge by making regular personal visits, and in other ways he deems necessary or advisable;

A written report shall be submitted periodically on each person under the counselor’s supervision to the department of corrections or, as appropriate, the department of family services and a copy shall be sent to the judge having jurisdiction of the case;

He shall advise and counsel his charges and encourage steps in the direction of rehabilitation and good citizenship.

All case records shall be confidential.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 99, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 5-84.4; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), deleted “justice and municipal court” following “investigations where requested by.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.